Illinois, session 104th, SB2410.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Sections 6-106.1 and 13-109 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-106.1)7    Sec. 6-106.1. School bus driver permit. 8    (a) The Secretary of State shall issue a school bus driver 9permit for the operation of first or second division vehicles 10being operated as school buses or a permit valid only for the 11operation of first division vehicles being operated as school 12buses to those applicants who have met all the requirements of 13the application and screening process under this Section to 14insure the welfare and safety of children who are transported 15on school buses throughout the State of Illinois. Applicants 16shall obtain the proper application required by the Secretary 17of State from their prospective or current employer and submit 18the completed application to the prospective or current 19employer along with the necessary fingerprint submission as 20required by the Illinois State Police to conduct 21fingerprint-based criminal background checks on current and 22future information available in the State system and current 23information available through the Federal Bureau of   SB2410- 2 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1Investigation's system. Applicants who have completed the 2fingerprinting requirements shall not be subjected to the 3fingerprinting process when applying for subsequent permits or 4submitting proof of successful completion of the annual 5refresher course. Individuals who on July 1, 1995 (the 6effective date of Public Act 88-612) possess a valid school 7bus driver permit that has been previously issued by the 8appropriate Regional School Superintendent are not subject to 9the fingerprinting provisions of this Section as long as the 10permit remains valid and does not lapse. The applicant shall 11be required to pay all related application and fingerprinting 12fees as established by rule, including, but not limited to, 13the amounts established by the Illinois State Police and the 14Federal Bureau of Investigation to process fingerprint-based 15criminal background investigations. All fees paid for 16fingerprint processing services under this Section shall be 17deposited into the State Police Services Fund for the cost 18incurred in processing the fingerprint-based criminal 19background investigations. All other fees paid under this 20Section shall be deposited into the Road Fund for the purpose 21of defraying the costs of the Secretary of State in 22administering this Section. Other than any applicant to 23operate a first division vehicle, all All applicants must: 24        1. be 21 years of age or older; 25        2. possess a valid and properly classified driver's 26    license issued by the Secretary of State;   SB2410- 3 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1        3. possess a valid driver's license, which has not 2    been revoked, suspended, or canceled for 3 years 3    immediately prior to the date of application, or have not 4    had his or her commercial motor vehicle driving privileges 5    disqualified within the 3 years immediately prior to the 6    date of application; 7        4. successfully pass a first division, or second 8    division, or school bus written test, administered by the 9    Secretary of State, on school bus operation, school bus 10    safety, and special traffic laws relating to school buses 11    and submit to a review of the applicant's driving habits 12    by the Secretary of State at the time the written test is 13    given; 14        5. demonstrate ability to exercise reasonable care in 15    the operation of school buses in accordance with rules 16    promulgated by the Secretary of State; 17        6. demonstrate physical fitness to operate school 18    buses by submitting the results of a medical examination, 19    including tests for drug use for each applicant not 20    subject to such testing pursuant to federal law, conducted 21    by a licensed physician, a licensed advanced practice 22    registered nurse, or a licensed physician assistant within 23    90 days of the date of application according to standards 24    promulgated by the Secretary of State; 25        7. affirm under penalties of perjury that he or she 26    has not made a false statement or knowingly concealed a   SB2410- 4 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1    material fact in any application for permit; 2        8. have completed an initial classroom course, 3    including first aid procedures, in school bus driver 4    safety as promulgated by the Secretary of State and, after 5    satisfactory completion of said initial course, an annual 6    refresher course; such courses and the agency or 7    organization conducting such courses shall be approved by 8    the Secretary of State; failure to complete the annual 9    refresher course shall result in cancellation of the 10    permit until such course is completed; 11        9. not have been under an order of court supervision 12    for or convicted of 2 or more serious traffic offenses, as 13    defined by rule, within one year prior to the date of 14    application that may endanger the life or safety of any of 15    the driver's passengers within the duration of the permit 16    period; 17        10. not have been under an order of court supervision 18    for or convicted of reckless driving, aggravated reckless 19    driving, driving while under the influence of alcohol, 20    other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or 21    any combination thereof, or reckless homicide resulting 22    from the operation of a motor vehicle within 3 years of the 23    date of application; 24        11. not have been convicted of committing or 25    attempting to commit any one or more of the following 26    offenses: (i) those offenses defined in Sections 8-1,   SB2410- 5 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1    8-1.2, 9-1, 9-1.2, 9-2, 9-2.1, 9-3, 9-3.2, 9-3.3, 10-1, 2    10-2, 10-3.1, 10-4, 10-5, 10-5.1, 10-6, 10-7, 10-9, 3    11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 11-6, 11-6.5, 4    11-6.6, 11-9, 11-9.1, 11-9.1A, 11-9.3, 11-9.4, 11-9.4-1, 5    11-14, 11-14.1, 11-14.3, 11-14.4, 11-15, 11-15.1, 11-16, 6    11-17, 11-17.1, 11-18, 11-18.1, 11-19, 11-19.1, 11-19.2, 7    11-20, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, 11-20.4, 11-21, 11-22, 8    11-23, 11-24, 11-25, 11-26, 11-30, 12-2.6, 12-3.05, 9    12-3.1, 12-3.3, 12-4, 12-4.1, 12-4.2, 12-4.2-5, 12-4.3, 10    12-4.4, 12-4.5, 12-4.6, 12-4.7, 12-4.9, 12-5.3, 12-6, 11    12-6.2, 12-7.1, 12-7.3, 12-7.4, 12-7.5, 12-11, 12-13, 12    12-14, 12-14.1, 12-15, 12-16, 12-21.5, 12-21.6, 12-33, 13    12C-5, 12C-10, 12C-20, 12C-30, 12C-45, 16-16, 16-16.1, 14    18-1, 18-2, 18-3, 18-4, 18-5, 19-6, 20-1, 20-1.1, 20-1.2, 15    20-1.3, 20-2, 24-1, 24-1.1, 24-1.2, 24-1.2-5, 24-1.6, 16    24-1.7, 24-2.1, 24-3.3, 24-3.5, 24-3.8, 24-3.9, 31A-1.1, 17    33A-2, and 33D-1, in subsection (A), clauses (a) and (b), 18    of Section 24-3, and those offenses contained in Article 19    29D of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 20    2012; (ii) those offenses defined in the Cannabis Control 21    Act except those offenses defined in subsections (a) and 22    (b) of Section 4, and subsection (a) of Section 5 of the 23    Cannabis Control Act; (iii) those offenses defined in the 24    Illinois Controlled Substances Act; (iv) those offenses 25    defined in the Methamphetamine Control and Community 26    Protection Act; (v) any offense committed or attempted in   SB2410- 6 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1    any other state or against the laws of the United States, 2    which if committed or attempted in this State would be 3    punishable as one or more of the foregoing offenses; (vi) 4    the offenses defined in Section 4.1 and 5.1 of the Wrongs 5    to Children Act or Section 11-9.1A of the Criminal Code of 6    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; (vii) those offenses 7    defined in Section 6-16 of the Liquor Control Act of 1934; 8    and (viii) those offenses defined in the Methamphetamine 9    Precursor Control Act;10        12. not have been repeatedly involved as a driver in 11    motor vehicle collisions or been repeatedly convicted of 12    offenses against laws and ordinances regulating the 13    movement of traffic, to a degree which indicates lack of 14    ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable care in the 15    safe operation of a motor vehicle or disrespect for the 16    traffic laws and the safety of other persons upon the 17    highway; 18        13. not have, through the unlawful operation of a 19    motor vehicle, caused a crash resulting in the death of 20    any person; 21        14. not have, within the last 5 years, been adjudged 22    to be afflicted with or suffering from any mental 23    disability or disease; 24        15. consent, in writing, to the release of results of 25    reasonable suspicion drug and alcohol testing under 26    Section 6-106.1c of this Code by the employer of the   SB2410- 7 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1    applicant to the Secretary of State; and2        16. not have been convicted of committing or 3    attempting to commit within the last 20 years: (i) an 4    offense defined in subsection (c) of Section 4, subsection 5    (b) of Section 5, and subsection (a) of Section 8 of the 6    Cannabis Control Act; or (ii) any offenses in any other 7    state or against the laws of the United States that, if 8    committed or attempted in this State, would be punishable 9    as one or more of the foregoing offenses. 10    (a-5) If an applicant's driver's license has been 11suspended within the 3 years immediately prior to the date of 12application for the sole reason of failure to pay child 13support, that suspension shall not bar the applicant from 14receiving a school bus driver permit. 15    (a-7) The Secretary of State, in conjunction with the 16Illinois State Board of Education, shall develop a separate 17classroom course and refresher course for operation of 18vehicles of the first division being operated as school buses. 19The course shall have an examination component that applicants 20must pass. Regional superintendents of schools, working with 21the Illinois State Board of Education, shall offer the course.22    (a-8) All applicants to operate a first division vehicle 23must:24        (1) meet the requirements of paragraphs 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 25    and 9 through 16 of subsection (a); and26        (2) complete the course developed and offered under   SB2410- 8 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1    subsection (a-7), or complete a training course 2    administered by the service provider in which the 3    applicant will be employed by, or under contract with, 4    that covers safe driving practices with a first division 5    vehicle, special considerations for transporting students 6    with disabilities, emergency preparedness, and safe 7    pick-up and drop-off procedures. The vendor course shall 8    have an examination component that applicants must pass. 9    Such vendor course must be approved by the Secretary of 10    State in conjunction with the Illinois State Board of 11    Education.12    (a-9) An applicant to operate a first division vehicle is 13exempt from the requirement of paragraph 6 of subsection (a) 14if the applicant will be providing transportation services 15with a provider that uses a telematics system that sends, 16receives, and stores telemetry data, including, but not 17limited to, device use, speeding, hard turning, hard braking, 18hard acceleration, and collision detection. 19    (a-10) By January 1, 2024, the Secretary of State, in 20conjunction with the Illinois State Board of Education, shall 21develop a separate classroom course and refresher course for 22operation of vehicles of the first division being operated as 23school buses. Regional superintendents of schools, working 24with the Illinois State Board of Education, shall offer the 25course. 26    (b) A school bus driver permit shall be valid for a period   SB2410- 9 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1specified by the Secretary of State as set forth by rule. It 2shall be renewable upon compliance with subsection (a) of this 3Section. 4    (c) A school bus driver permit shall contain the holder's 5driver's license number, legal name, residence address, zip 6code, and date of birth, a brief description of the holder, and 7a space for signature. The Secretary of State may require a 8suitable photograph of the holder. 9    (d) The employer shall be responsible for conducting a 10pre-employment interview with prospective school bus driver 11candidates, distributing school bus driver applications and 12medical forms to be completed by the applicant, and submitting 13the applicant's fingerprint cards to the Illinois State Police 14that are required for the criminal background investigations. 15The employer shall certify in writing to the Secretary of 16State that all pre-employment conditions have been 17successfully completed including the successful completion of 18an Illinois specific criminal background investigation through 19the Illinois State Police and the submission of necessary 20fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 21criminal history information available through the Federal 22Bureau of Investigation system. The applicant shall present 23the certification to the Secretary of State at the time of 24submitting the school bus driver permit application. 25    (e) Permits shall initially be provisional upon receiving 26certification from the employer that all pre-employment   SB2410- 10 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1conditions have been successfully completed, and upon 2successful completion of all training and examination 3requirements for the classification of the vehicle to be 4operated, the Secretary of State shall provisionally issue a 5School Bus Driver Permit. The permit shall remain in a 6provisional status pending the completion of the Federal 7Bureau of Investigation's criminal background investigation 8based upon fingerprinting specimens submitted to the Federal 9Bureau of Investigation by the Illinois State Police. The 10Federal Bureau of Investigation shall report the findings 11directly to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State 12shall remove the bus driver permit from provisional status 13upon the applicant's successful completion of the Federal 14Bureau of Investigation's criminal background investigation. 15    (f) A school bus driver permit holder shall notify the 16employer and the Secretary of State if he or she is issued an 17order of court supervision for or convicted in another state 18of an offense that would make him or her ineligible for a 19permit under subsection (a) of this Section. The written 20notification shall be made within 5 days of the entry of the 21order of court supervision or conviction. Failure of the 22permit holder to provide the notification is punishable as a 23petty offense for a first violation and a Class B misdemeanor 24for a second or subsequent violation. 25    (g) Cancellation; suspension; notice and procedure. 26        (1) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus   SB2410- 11 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1    driver permit of an applicant whose criminal background 2    investigation discloses that he or she is not in 3    compliance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this 4    Section. 5        (2) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 6    driver permit when he or she receives notice that the 7    permit holder fails to comply with any provision of this 8    Section or any rule promulgated for the administration of 9    this Section. 10        (3) The Secretary of State shall cancel a school bus 11    driver permit if the permit holder's restricted commercial 12    or commercial driving privileges are withdrawn or 13    otherwise invalidated. 14        (4) The Secretary of State may not issue a school bus 15    driver permit for a period of 3 years to an applicant who 16    fails to obtain a negative result on a drug test as 17    required in item 6 of subsection (a) of this Section or 18    under federal law. 19        (5) The Secretary of State shall forthwith suspend a 20    school bus driver permit for a period of 3 years upon 21    receiving notice that the holder has failed to obtain a 22    negative result on a drug test as required in item 6 of 23    subsection (a) of this Section or under federal law. 24        (6) The Secretary of State shall suspend a school bus 25    driver permit for a period of 3 years upon receiving 26    notice from the employer that the holder failed to perform   SB2410- 12 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1    the inspection procedure set forth in subsection (a) or 2    (b) of Section 12-816 of this Code. 3        (7) The Secretary of State shall suspend a school bus 4    driver permit for a period of 3 years upon receiving 5    notice from the employer that the holder refused to submit 6    to an alcohol or drug test as required by Section 6-106.1c 7    or has submitted to a test required by that Section which 8    disclosed an alcohol concentration of more than 0.00 or 9    disclosed a positive result on a National Institute on 10    Drug Abuse five-drug panel, utilizing federal standards 11    set forth in 49 CFR 40.87. 12    The Secretary of State shall notify the State 13Superintendent of Education and the permit holder's 14prospective or current employer that the applicant (1) has 15failed a criminal background investigation or (2) is no longer 16eligible for a school bus driver permit; and of the related 17cancellation of the applicant's provisional school bus driver 18permit. The cancellation shall remain in effect pending the 19outcome of a hearing pursuant to Section 2-118 of this Code. 20The scope of the hearing shall be limited to the issuance 21criteria contained in subsection (a) of this Section. A 22petition requesting a hearing shall be submitted to the 23Secretary of State and shall contain the reason the individual 24feels he or she is entitled to a school bus driver permit. The 25permit holder's employer shall notify in writing to the 26Secretary of State that the employer has certified the removal   SB2410- 13 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1of the offending school bus driver from service prior to the 2start of that school bus driver's next work shift. An 3employing school board that fails to remove the offending 4school bus driver from service is subject to the penalties 5defined in Section 3-14.23 of the School Code. A school bus 6contractor who violates a provision of this Section is subject 7to the penalties defined in Section 6-106.11. 8    All valid school bus driver permits issued under this 9Section prior to January 1, 1995, shall remain effective until 10their expiration date unless otherwise invalidated. 11    (h) When a school bus driver permit holder who is a service 12member is called to active duty, the employer of the permit 13holder shall notify the Secretary of State, within 30 days of 14notification from the permit holder, that the permit holder 15has been called to active duty. Upon notification pursuant to 16this subsection, (i) the Secretary of State shall characterize 17the permit as inactive until a permit holder renews the permit 18as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, and (ii) if a 19permit holder fails to comply with the requirements of this 20Section while called to active duty, the Secretary of State 21shall not characterize the permit as invalid. 22    (i) A school bus driver permit holder who is a service 23member returning from active duty must, within 90 days, renew 24a permit characterized as inactive pursuant to subsection (h) 25of this Section by complying with the renewal requirements of 26subsection (b) of this Section.   SB2410- 14 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1    (j) For purposes of subsections (h) and (i) of this 2Section: 3    "Active duty" means active duty pursuant to an executive 4order of the President of the United States, an act of the 5Congress of the United States, or an order of the Governor. 6    "Service member" means a member of the Armed Services or 7reserve forces of the United States or a member of the Illinois 8National Guard. 9    (k) A private carrier employer of a school bus driver 10permit holder, having satisfied the employer requirements of 11this Section, shall be held to a standard of ordinary care for 12intentional acts committed in the course of employment by the 13bus driver permit holder. This subsection (k) shall in no way 14limit the liability of the private carrier employer for 15violation of any provision of this Section or for the 16negligent hiring or retention of a school bus driver permit 17holder. 18(Source: P.A. 102-168, eff. 7-27-21; 102-299, eff. 8-6-21; 19102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-726, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 205-13-22; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 102-1130, eff. 7-1-23; 103-605, 21eff. 7-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25.) 22    (625 ILCS 5/13-109)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 13-109)23    Sec. 13-109. Safety test prior to application for license -24 Subsequent tests - Repairs - Retest.25    (a) Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 13, each   SB2410- 15 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1second division vehicle, first division vehicle including a 2taxi which is used for a purpose that requires a school bus 3driver permit, and medical transport vehicle, except those 4vehicles other than school buses or medical transport vehicles 5owned or operated by a municipal corporation or political 6subdivision having a population of 1,000,000 or more 7inhabitants which are subjected to safety tests imposed by 8local ordinance or resolution, operated in whole or in part 9over the highways of this State, motor vehicle used for driver 10education training, and each vehicle designed to carry 15 or 11fewer passengers operated by a contract carrier transporting 12employees in the course of their employment on a highway of 13this State, shall be subjected to the safety test provided for 14in Chapter 13 of this Code. Tests shall be conducted at an 15official testing station or by an official mobile safety 16testing company within 6 months prior to the application for 17registration as provided for in this Code. Subsequently each 18vehicle shall be subject to tests (i) at least every 6 months, 19(i.5) in the case of first division vehicles, including taxis 20that are used for a purpose that requires a school bus driver's 21permit, at least every 12 months, or 10,000 miles, whichever 22occurs first, (ii) in the case of school buses and first 23division vehicles including taxis which are used for a purpose 24that requires a school bus driver permit, at least every 6 25months or 10,000 miles, whichever occurs first, (iii) in the 26case of driver education vehicles used by public high schools,   SB2410- 16 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1at least every 12 months for vehicles over 5 model years of age 2or having an odometer reading of over 75,000 miles, whichever 3occurs first, or (iv) in the case of truck tractors, 4semitrailers, and property-carrying vehicles registered for a 5gross weight of more than 10,000 pounds but less than 26,001 6pounds, at least every 12 months, and according to schedules 7established by rules and regulations promulgated by the 8Department. Any component subject to regular inspection which 9is damaged in a reportable crash must be reinspected before 10the bus or first division vehicle including a taxi which is 11used for a purpose that requires a school bus driver permit is 12returned to service.13    (b) The Department shall also conduct periodic 14nonscheduled inspections of school buses, of buses registered 15as charitable vehicles and of religious organization buses. If 16such inspection reveals that a vehicle is not in substantial 17compliance with the rules promulgated by the Department, the 18Department shall remove the Certificate of Safety from the 19vehicle, and shall place the vehicle out-of-service. A bright 20orange, triangular decal shall be placed on an out-of-service 21vehicle where the Certificate of Safety has been removed. The 22vehicle must pass a safety test at an official testing station 23or official mobile safety testing company before it is again 24placed in service.25    (c) If the violation is not substantial a bright yellow, 26triangular sticker shall be placed next to the Certificate of   SB2410- 17 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1Safety at the time the nonscheduled inspection is made. The 2Department shall reinspect the vehicle after 3 working days to 3determine that the violation has been corrected and remove the 4yellow, triangular decal. If the violation is not corrected 5within 3 working days, the Department shall place the vehicle 6out-of-service in accordance with procedures in subsection 7(b).8    (d) If a violation is not substantial and does not 9directly affect the safe operation of the vehicle, the 10Department shall issue a warning notice requiring correction 11of the violation. Such correction shall be accomplished as 12soon as practicable and a report of the correction shall be 13made to the Department within 30 days in a manner established 14by the Department. If the Department has not been advised that 15the corrections have been made, and the violations still 16exist, the Department shall place the vehicle out-of-service 17in accordance with procedures in subsection (b).18    (e) The Department is authorized to promulgate regulations 19to implement its program of nonscheduled inspections. Causing 20or allowing the operation of an out-of-service vehicle with 21passengers or unauthorized removal of an out-of-service 22sticker is a Class 3 felony. Causing or allowing the operation 23of a vehicle with a 3-day sticker for longer than 3 days with 24the sticker attached or the unauthorized removal of a 3-day 25sticker is a Class C misdemeanor.26    (f) If a second division vehicle, first division vehicle   SB2410- 18 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1including a taxi which is used for a purpose that requires a 2school bus driver permit, medical transport vehicle, or 3vehicle operated by a contract carrier as provided in 4subsection (a) of this Section is in safe mechanical 5condition, as determined pursuant to Chapter 13, the operator 6of the official testing station or official mobile safety 7testing company must at once issue to the second division 8vehicle, first division vehicle including a taxi which is used 9for a purpose that requires a school bus driver permit, or 10medical transport vehicle a certificate of safety, in the form 11and manner prescribed by the Department, which shall be 12affixed to the vehicle by the certified safety tester who 13performed the safety tests. The owner of the second division 14vehicle, first division vehicle including a taxi which is used 15for a purpose that requires a school bus driver permit, or 16medical transport vehicle or the contract carrier shall at all 17times display the Certificate of Safety on the second division 18vehicle, first division vehicle including a taxi which is used 19for a purpose that requires a school bus driver permit, 20medical transport vehicle, or vehicle operated by a contract 21carrier in the manner prescribed by the Department.22    (g) If a test shows that a second division vehicle, first 23division vehicle including a taxi which is used for a purpose 24that requires a school bus driver permit, medical transport 25vehicle, or vehicle operated by a contract carrier is not in 26safe mechanical condition as provided in this Section, it   SB2410- 19 -LRB104 09301 LNS 19359 b1shall not be operated on the highways until it has been 2repaired and submitted to a retest at an official testing 3station or official mobile safety testing company. If the 4owner or contract carrier submits the vehicle to a retest at a 5different official testing station or official mobile safety 6testing company from that where it failed to pass the first 7test, he or she shall present to the operator of the second 8station the report of the original test, and shall notify the 9Department in writing, giving the name and address of the 10original testing station or official mobile safety testing 11company and the defects which prevented the issuance of a 12Certificate of Safety, and the name and address of the second 13official testing station or official mobile safety testing 14company making the retest.15(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 103-476, eff. 1-1-24.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 172025.